Maryland, session 2026, HB1156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
12 That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. hb1156*

2 HOUSE BILL 1156
1 Article 5 – Calvert County
2 14–102.
3 (g) (1) In the event a qualified volunteer who has completed 25 years of
4 certified service dies, a death OR BURIAL benefit up to [$10,000] $14,000 shall be payable.
5 (2) In the event a volunteer who is receiving benefits under Subsection (h)
6 of this section dies, a DEATH OR burial benefit up to [$336] $560 for each year of certified
7 service shall be payable.
8 SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
9 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.